Washington statutes.
RCW 36.64.030

Joint courthouse and city hall—Approval of contract.

The contract between a county and a city shall be made only after a proper resolution of the board of county commissioners of the county and a proper ordinance of the city have been passed specifically authorizing it. The contract shall be binding upon the county and the city during the term thereof, or until it is modified or abrogated by mutual consent evidenced by a proper resolution and ordinance of the county and city.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.64.030. Prior: 1913 c 90 s 4; RRS s 3995.]